etc/xep/hyphen/huhyph_rx.tex
\patterns{
.a2
.adás1s2
.a1dá
.2a1e1
.agyon1
.ag2y
.a1gyo
.al1eg
.a1le
.al1e2m
.al1e2s
.al1ér
.a1lé
.al1is
.a1li
.al1os
.a1lo
.arc1c
.ar2c3ho
.arc2h
.at1mo1
.2a1z1a2
.az1ám
.a1zá
.2a1ze2
.á2
.á1l1a2
.á1l1e
.á1l1é2
.á1l1i
.ál1ok
.á1lo
.á1re2
.ár1em
.ár2nyo
.árn2y
.á1ro2
.ár1os
.ár1s2
.át1ad.
.á1ta
.át1a1da
.á1t1á2
.á1t1e2
.á1t1é2
.á1t1i2
.á1to2
.át1ol
.át1or
.át1os
.á1t1ö2
.b2
.ba2l1e2g
.1ba
.ba1le
.ba1ts
.bá1th
.1bá
.be2c1sé
.1be
.bec2s
.be1i2
.be1k2
.bi2o
.1bi
.bo2rit
.1bo
.bo1ri
.bu2s1zá
.1bu
.bus2z
.c2
.c1le2
.c2s2
.csõda2rab.
.1c1sõ
.csõ1da
.csõda1ra
.d2
.da2i
.1da
.di1kr
.1di
.e2
.e1b1u2
.e1gy1a
.eg2y
.egy1ü2l
.e1gyü
.el1a2d
.e1la
.el1a2k
.el1an
.ela2s
.el1ass
.el1a1s1zo
.elas2z
.e1lá2
.el1ál
.el1á2s
.el1áz
.el1e2gyek
.e1le
.eleg2y
.ele1gye
.el1ejt
.el1emel
.ele1me
.el1eng
.el1e2p
.el1e2r
.el1e2se
.el1e2sés
.ele1sé
.el1e2si
.el1esn
.el1es3s
.el1est2
.el1esv
.el1es2z
.el1ék1t2
.e1lé
.el1é1le
.elé2n
.el1é1ne
.el1ér.
.el1é2re
.el1ért
.el1érv
.el1id
.e1li
.el1in
.el1ir
.eli2s
.el1iss
.el1is2z
.el1it1ta
.el1ít
.e1lí
.elo2k
.e1lo
.el1o1ká
.el1o2s
.e1lö2
.el1ö1li
.el1ö1lõ
.el1ölt.
.elõ1i2
.e1lõ
.el1t2
.e1l1u2
.e1lü2
.el1ül.
.el1ü1li
.el1ült
.el1ülv
.es1er
.e1se
.et2h
.ex1el
.e1xe
.ez1e2l
.e1ze
.é2
.égés1s2
.é1gé
.é1g1o
.é1k1a2
.é1k1i
.é1n1á
.én1el
.é1ne
.é1pe2
.ép1es
.ér2c1si
.érc2s
.ér1el
.é1re
.é1t1é
.f2
.fa2jeg
.1fa
.f2a1je
.fe2len
.1fe
.fe1le
.fe2lev
.fe2lék
.fe1lé
.fe2lül.
.fe1lü
.fé2lér
.1fé
.fé1lé
.fé2lév
.fé2má
.fö2lül.
.1fö
.fö1lü
.g2
.ga2z1em
.1ga
.g2a1ze
.gé2ná2
.1gé
.gi1g2
.1gi
.h2
.ha2d1e2
.1ha
.ha1le2
.ha2lev
.ha2l1és
.ha1lé
.há2li
.1há
.hánc2s1
.há2tu2s
.há1tu
.he2i
.1he
.horo1s
.1ho
.ho1ro
.i2
.in2d3z
.io2ná
.i1o
.í2
.íráskés2z1
.í1rá
.írás1k2
.írás1ké
.j2
.jazz1
.1ja
.je2gy1á2
.1je
.jeg2y
.k2
.ka2ring
.1ka
.ka1ri
.kés1s2
.1ké
.ké2t1a2
.ké2tá
.ki1á2
.1ki
.ki1é2
.ki1g2
.kr2
.l2
.la2pa
.1la
.le2g1
.1le
.le3g2esle2g1
.le1ge
.1leges1le
.le3g2esle3g2esle2g1
.legesle1ge
.legesleges1le
.legé2nyem
.le3gén
.le1gé
.leg2én2y
.legé1nye
.le3g2y
.le2ná
.le1t2r
.lé2ta1
.1lé
.li2o1
.1li
.lisz1t1á
.lis2z
.lókés2z1
.1ló
.l2ókés
.ló1ké
.ló1s2
.l2õ1e2
.1lõ
.1ly1o
.l2y
.m2
.ma1lo2
.1ma
.má2r1is
.1má
.má1ri
.me2g1á
.1me
.me2g1e2s
.me1ge
.me2g1é2
.me2gis
.me1gi2
.me2gõ2
.me2i
.mé2s1zi
.1mé
.més2z
.mu2e
.1mu
.n2
.na2gya
.1na
.nag2y
.na2gyá
.n2a2p1e
.na1t
.nerc1
.1ne
.ne2um
.ne1u
.né2pí
.1né
.ny2l
.n2y
.o2
.ok1a2d
.o1ka
.ok1ir
.o1ki
.ó2
.ó1é2
.óf2
.ö2
.ö1n1á
.ön1k2
.ön3n
.ös1s1z1á
.ös2s2z
.ö1te2
.öt1el
.ö2zö2n1ö
.ö1zö
.õ2
.õr1an
.õ1ra
.õ1s1a2
.õs1e2r
.õ1se
.õ1s1í2
.õz3s
.p2
.pa2i
.1pa
.pais1
.pe2r1a2
.1pe
.pé2k1
.1pé
.ph2
.pier2
.1pi
.pi1e
.po2re
.1po
.q2
.r2
.ra2bi2g
.1ra
.ra1bi
.rát2
.1rá
.re2ár
.1re
.re1á
.ren2d1õ2
.ru2ma
.1ru
.s2
.sa2li
.1sa
.sc2
.sk2
.so2ki
.1so
.so1n2y
.so2rál
.so1rá
.sp2
.st2
.s1to2
.su2r
.1su
.s2z2
.sza2kér
.1s1za
.sza1ké
.sze2s1zá
.1s1ze
.szes2z
.szé2t
.1s1zé
.szk2
.szódás1
.1s1zó
.szó1dá
.szt2
.t2
.ta2ni
.1ta
.ta2nos
.ta1no
.t2a2ur
.ta1u
.tá2v1i2rato1zá
.1tá
.tá1vi
.távi1ra
.távira1to
.te2j1á2
.1te
.té2nyi
.1té
.t2én2y
.té2rá2
.t2o2ké
.1to
.tö2k1élv
.1tö
.tö1ké
.tölcséres1
.tölc2s
.töl1c1sé
.tölcsé1re
.tû2z3s
.1tû
.u2
.utas1s
.u1ta
.ú2
.ú1r1a
.úr1ist
.ú1ri
.ú1t1a2
.ú1t1e
.ü2
.ük1
.û2
.û1r1i
.v2
.va2d1al
.1va
.va1da
.va2gyi
.vag2y
.vasas1s
.va1sa
.va2sol
.va1so
.vé2g1o
.1vé
.w2
.x2
.y2
.z2
.ze2i
.1ze
.z2s2
2a.
2a1a
aa2d
aa2j
aa2k
aa2l
a2am
aa2n
aa2p
aa2u
aa2v
aa2z
2a1á
aá2b
aá2gak
aá1ga
aá2g2y
a2ál.
a2áln
aá2p
aá2r
aá2s
aá2t1
aá1ta2
aba2de
a1ba
2aban
2abar
2abáj
a1bá
2abáz
2abes
a1be
2abir
a1bi
2abiz
2abom
a1bo
abos3s
2a1bõ
2a1bú
a2b1ü
a2c2e.
a1ce
ace2l
ac1e1le
acé2l1e2
a1cé
a2c1ép
ac1é1re
a2c1há
ac2h
ac3hoz
a1c1ho
2a1cí
a2c3ság
ac2s
a1c1sá
a2c3sü
ac3s2z
ada2le
a1da
ada2li
ada2l1ú
a2dap
ad1apr
ad2a2t1e2
a2d1á2g
a1dá
a2dá1sú
ad2del
ad1de
a2d1e2g
a1de
ade2i
1a2dek
ad1e2le
ad1e1lõ
ad1elv
ade2n
ad1e1ne
ade2s
ad1e1sé
adet2
ad1e2v
adé2ke
a1dé
a2d1ép
a2d1é2v
ad1i1de
a1di
adi2o1g2
adi1o
a2d1íz
a1dí
a2d1or1zá
a1do
1a2dód
a1dó
ad1ö2l
a1dö
ad2rót
ad1ró
adu2r
a1du
ad1u1ra
2a1dú
2a1e
ae2b
ae2c
ae2dé
aegés2z1
ae1gé
a2e1i
ae2k
ae2l1a2
ae2le
ae2l1o
ae2lõ
ae2me
ae2p
ae2re
aero1s
ae1ro
aeros2z2
ae2rõ
ae2se
ae2sé
ae2si
ae2sõ
ae2v
ae2z
2a1é
aé2g
aé2h
aé2k
aé2l
aé2n
aé2p
aé2r
aé2v
2afajn
a1fa
2a1fe
afe2li
2afés
a1fé
2a1fi
2a1fõ
af2re
2a1fü
a2g1a2j
a1ga
ag1an2y
ag1arc
agán1n
a1gá
agá2nyé
agán2y
a2gár.
ag1á1t1a
ag1e1dé
a1ge
a2g1eg
ag1elm
ag1elt
ag1elv
a2gem
ag1emb
a2g1ev
a2g1é2g
a1gé
a2g1é2l
ag1é2pí
1agg.
ag3gye
ag2g2y
a1g2hó
agi2g
a1gi
ag1i1gé
a2g1i2p
a2g1ír
a1gí
ag1li2
ago2na
a1go
ag2on
2agor
a2g1ors
a2g1ó1rá
a1gó
a2g1öt
a1gö
a1g2raf
ag1ra
a2gut
a1gu
ag1u1ta
ag1u2tá
a2g1út
a1gú
a2g1ü2
a2gyad
ag2y
a1gya
agy1a2dó
a2gyag
ag2y1ag2y
agy1a1la
agy1alk
agy1an2y
a2gyál
a1gyá
agy1á1ri
a2gyát
agy1el
a1gye
a2gy1em
a2gy1en
a2gyep
agy1e1rõ
a2gy1es
a2gy1ez
a2gyér
a1gyé
agy1é1re
a2gyét
a2gyic
a1gyi
a2gyim
a2gy1ip
a2gyir
agy1is.
a2gy1ist
a2gyo1ko
a1gyo
a2gyokt
agyo2r
agy1o1ro
2ahar
a1ha
2a1he
1ahh
2a1hi
2a1hí
aho2l1i
a1ho
2a1hu
a1i
a2i2a.
ai1a
ai2bo
2ai2de
ai2dõ
ai2e
2aig2
ai2gazí1tó
ai1ga
aiga1zí
ai2gé
a2ign
ai2j
ai2k1as
ai1ka
ai2k1e2
ai2m2a.
ai1ma
2ai2má
ai2nal
ai1na
ai2nas
2aing
2aint
ai2o
2ai2p
ai2ram
ai1ra
ai2rá
ai2rod
ai1ro
ai2zo
2a1í2
a2j1al
a1ja
aja2n
aj1a1na
2a1je
a2j1e2d
a2j1e1gé
a2j1elm
aj1e2lõ
a2j1em
a2j1er
a2jég
a1jé
a2j1ék
a2j1ir
a1ji
1ajkú1a
aj1kú
a2j1o1la
a1jo
aj1old
aj1ü2l
a1jü
aj2ze
aj2zí
aj2z1sí
ajz2s
a2k1akn
a1ka
a2k1alk
ak1ann
2akap
ak2a2s1ü
2akav
akás1s2
a1ká
2a1ke
a2k1eg
ak1els
ak1emb
a2k1e2rõ
aké2k
a1ké
a2k1é1ke
2akép
ak1é2pí
2akérd
a2k1é2ret
aké1re
ak1értel
akér1te
a2k1ér1tõ
2akés
a1k2hó
akh2
aki1á2
a1ki
2akin
a2k1i2p
ak1i1ro
ak1is.
aki2s1a
a2k1is1k2
a2k1ism
ak1izm
2a1kí
ak2kór
ak1kó
ak2le1i
ak1le
ak2lés
ak1lé
ak2lin
ak1li
a2k1o2l2y
a1ko
a2k1orv
2a1kö
a2k1örv
ak1õr.
a1kõ
2ak1ré
2ak1ri
ak2rit
a1k2ru
a2k1u2g
a1ku
2akut
2a1kú
a2k1útr
2a1kü
ak1ü1lé
a2k1ü2v
2akv
al1abl2
a1la
alag1g
ala2gol
ala1go
al2a2j1e2
1a2l2a1kí
1a2lakok
ala1ko
1a2l2a1kú
a2lan2y
al2a2nye2
ala2p1a2
ala2pá2r
ala1pá
1a2la1pi
1a2la1pí
alap1p
a2láf
a1lá
al1ág.
al1á2ga
al1ág1g2
al1á2gi
al1ág1k2
al1á2go
1a2lá1í2
2alán
a2láp
a2l2e.
a1le
al1eln
al1elt
al1eml
al1en2y
al1e2rõ
al1esp2
a2l1est2
ale2s2z
al1ez
a2léb
a1lé
a2l1é2ne
a2l1érz
a2l1é2te
1al1fö
alg2
al1gr
al1i1do
a1li
a2l1ikr
alió2ra
ali1ó
a2l1i1rá
al1is1k2
al1isp2
al1itt
a2l1í2rá
a1lí
1aljb
1al1ji2
1aljn
1aljz
al2l1aj
al1la
1almád
al1má
1almák
almás1s2
2alogizm
a1lo
alo1gi
aloi2do
alo1i
2alok
al1o1la
alo2mit
alo1mi2
alo2m1o2k
alo1mo
2alor
alos1s
a2l1oszt
alos2z
2aló3g2i1á
a1ló
al2óg
aló1gi
2aló1gu
alókés2z1
al2ókés
aló1ké
a2l1ön
a1lö
a2l1ös
al2t1el
al1te
al1úr.
a1lú
al1ú1ri
al1útr
a2l1ü2
1al1vó
a2lyál
al2y
a1lyá
a2ly1e
am1a2dó
a1ma
2amag
am1akk
am1app
a2m1arc
am1arr
ama2ter
am2a1te
ama2tin
ama1ti
2a1má
a2m1árj
am2b1eg
am1be
am2b1õ
a2m2e.
a1me
ame2g1á
a2m1e1lá
a2m1e2l1o
am1els
am1elt
a2m1erd
1a2me1ri
a2m1e2rõ
a2m1érd
a1mé
am1fr
a2mim
a1mi
a2m1i2rá
ami1se2
amis3s
am1ír
a1mí
2amod
a1mo
amos3s
a2m1ó2r
a1mó
a2m1ö2
a2mõ
am1õr
am1õs
am1p2h
2amun
a1mu
2amut
a2m1ü2
2a1mû
a2nah
a1na
an1akk
an1alj
an1an2y
ana2s1ze
anas2z
a2n1az
anás1s2
a1ná
an2c2e.
an1ce
ancs1es
anc2s
an1c1se
an2c1sõ
an2dolv
an1do
an1eb
a1ne
a2ner
a2nes
ane1t1o
ane2u
a2n1e2z
2a1né
ané2v
an1évb
an1é1ve
an1évn
an2gad
an1ga
an2g1em
an1ge
an2gí
an2g1or
an1go
an2g1os2z
an2g1ös
an1gö
1anim
a1ni
an2k1a2k
an1ka
ank1a1la
an2ka1u
an2k1el
an1ke
an2k1ék.
an1ké
ank1os2z
an1ko
an2k1u2
an2kü
ano1g2
a1no
an1old
an1onn
an1ott
an1ó1rá
a1nó
2a1nö
an1ö2t
ansz1ál
ans2z
an1s1zá
an2s1z1u2
an2ta1u
an1ta
a2nü
any1a1la
an2y
a1nya
1a2nyád
a1nyá
a2nyám.
a2ny1á2rak
anyá1ra
2a1nye
a2ny1ed
a2ny1em
a2ny1e1sõ
a1nyé2
any1éh
any1ék
any1ér
a2nyif
a1nyi
a2nyig
any1i2gaz1
a2ny1i1ga
a2nyim
2a1nyo
a2nyor
a2ny1os2z
any1ó2r
a1nyó
a2nyö
a2nyõ
an1zo2
2a1o
ao2la
a2o1lo
ao2ro
2a1ó
a2ób
a2óc
a2óf
aó2l
aó2ra
aó2rá
aó2ri
2a1ö2
2a1õ2
apa2c1s1i
a1pa
apac2s
ap1a2da
1a2pa1i
1a2pa1ké
ap1a2la
ap1alk
apa2tér
ap2a1té
1a2pád
a1pá
1a2pá1é
a2p1ág
1a2pá1i
a2páll
a2p1á1ru
a2pá2t1a
2a1pe
a2p1e2g
ape2i
ape2l
ap1e1le
ap1elg
ap1elj
ap1e1lõ
ap1elv
a2p1em
ape2n
a2p1e1ne
ap1en2y
ape2s
ap1e1se
ap1f2
a2p1i1de
a1pi
api2g
a2p1i1ge
a2p1i2rá
a2p1ist
a2p1ín
a1pí
2apl
a2p1o1la
a1po
a2p1o2pe
apos3s
ap1ös
a1pö
ap1öt
ap2rém
ap1ré
a1p2rés
1ap1rí
ap1szt2
aps2z
ap1t2
ap1udv
a1pu
ap1u1tá
ar1ajt
a1ra
ar2a2nye2
aran2y
ar1a1rá
a2r1ág.
a1rá
a2r1á2ga
ará2gáb
ará1gá
ará2gán
ará2gár
ará2gát
ará2gáv
a2r1ág1b2
a2r1ág3g2
a2r1á1gi
a2r1á2go
a2r1ágr
a2r1ág1t2
ar1á2guk
ará1gu
a2r1á2gun
a2r1á2g2y
a2r1áll
ará2nyé
arán2y
ar2car
ar1ca
ar2ced
ar1ce
ar2ces
ar2cö
arc3sor
arc2s
ar1c1so
1ar1cú
ar2dél
ar1dé
2a1re
ar1e2d2z
are2l
ar1elh
a2r1e1lo
a2r1e2m
aren2d1õ
a2r1er
a2r1e2v
ar1é2ne
a1ré
a2r1é2r
aré2z1
ar1gh
argon1n
ar1go
arg2on
a2r1i2d
a1ri
a2r1i1ga
a2r1ing1b2
a2r1in1ge
a2rizm2a.
ariz1ma
a2rizmán
ariz1má
a2ri1zo
ar1k1he
arkh2
ar2k1õ2
ar2k1u2s
ar1ku
2a1ro
arog2r
aro2mis
aro1mi
a2r1or
2a1ró
a2r1ó2rá
a2r1ö2l
a1rö
a2r1õ2
ar1s2h
ar1t1há
art2o1g2rá
ar1to
art1old
ar2t1õ2r
ar1tõ
ar1t2y
2a1ru
a2r1ü
a2r1û2
ar2v1ér
ar1vé
a1ry
a2s1a2g
a1sa
2asaj
a2s1a2kar
asa1ka
2asal
a2s1alk
a2s1alm
asa2n
a2s1ant
a2s1an2y
a2s1apr
a2s1ál
a1sá
a2s1á1ru
2asáv
2a1se
as1e2d
as1e2k
as1ell
as1emb
as1e2s
as1ez
as1é1he
a1sé
as1ék.
a2s1é2l
a2s1étv
a2s1é2v
asi2d
a1si
as1i1de
a2s1i2p
a2s1is1k2
a2s1i1zo
2asík
a1sí
as1old
a1so
2asor
as1ord
a2s1os2z
a2s1ó1rá
a1só
as1ö2k
a1sö
as1ön
a2s1ös
2asp
as1sy
as3szab
as2s2z
as1s1za
astil2
as1ti
2as1tí
a2s1urn
a1su
a2s1u2t
a2s1ú2t
a1sú
2a1sü
as1ün
a2s1ür
a2s1üs
a2s1ü2v
2a1sû
a2sz1ad
as2z
a1s1za
asz1ág.
a1s1zá
a2szárad
aszá1ra
2aszeg
a1s1ze
2aszek
asz1e2lõ
a2sz1év
a1s1zé
a2szid
a1s1zi
2asz1kó
asz2kóp
a2sz1ors
a1s1zo
asz1ön
a1s1zö
asz2t1és
asz1té
asz2t1ív
asz1tí
2a1s1zü
1asz1z
at1abl2
a1ta
2atak
2atan
2atar
a2ta2rán
ata1rá
a2t1arc
ata2tom
ata1to
a2t1ág
a1tá
2atál
atá2nal
atá1na
2atár
a2t1á2ram
atá1ra
a2t1átl
a2t1átv
atá2v1i2
atá2v1í2
2a1te
a2t1ef
at1e2gé
at1e2gye
ateg2y
ate2led
ate1le
at1e2lem
at1elh
at1elm
at1elv
at1elz
at1emb
at1eml
at1e1po
at1e2tet
ate1te
at1e2ve
a2t1e2z
2a1té
at1é1he
a2t1é2le
a2t1ép
a2t1érz
a2t1év.
2at1f2
at2hé
at2hón
at1hó
atig2
a1ti
a2t1i1ga
at1i2gé
a2t1inf
ati2nó
at1i1ro
a2t1is1k2
2atn
a2t1ob
a1to
ato1g2
at2o2me2
at1opt
2ator
at1ors2z
ator1s2
a2t1orv
atos3s
atos2z2
ato1szf2
2a1tó
a2t1ó2rá
ató2ri1á
ató1ri
ató1s2z
2a1tö
a2t1ös
at1ö2ve
a2t1ö2vö
at2sán
at1sá
at1tó2
at2tór
at1t1re
at1t1ré
2a1tu
a2t1uj
1atyj
at2y
a1tyl
2atz
a1u
a2u2de
au2ga
a2ug2h
au2go
au1k2r
a2u1l2y
2aur
a2us.
au2tal
au1ta
a2ut2ó.
au1tó
au2z2s
a1ú
aú2r1
aú2s
2a1ü2
a1û2
av1anh
a1va
avara2n
ava1ra
ava2s1as
ava1sa
ava2s1ze
avas2z
2a1vá
2a1vi
avi2c1se
avic2s
avíz1
a1ví
2ay
a1ya
a1yá
a1ye
2a1za
aza2teg
az2a1te
aza1ú2
a2z1áll
a1zá
az1ált
azás1s2
az2du
2a1ze
az1e2le
az1elj
az1e1lõ
aze2o
az1év
a1zé
az1i2d
a1zi
azo2n1á
a1zo
2a1zó
az1ó1ta
az1p2
a2z3ság
az2s
a1z1sá
az3st2
a2z1sú
a2z3sü
a2z1ut
a1zu
a2z1új
a1zú
2á.
á1a2
á1á2
áb1áll
á1bá
áb2b1a2d
áb1ba
áb2b1é2
áb2bis
áb1bi
áb2bol
áb1bo
áb2bos
áb2b1ot
áb2bö2
áb2bú
ábe2l1a
á1be
ábe2lér
ábe1lé
á2b1e1lõ
á2b1e2m
á2b1e2n
á2b1ér
á1bé
á2b1ikr
á1bi
á2b1in
á2b1ir
2ábiz
áb1izm
áb1izz
2á1bí
1áb1rá
ábr2
2á1bu
ábu2t
áb1u1tá
áca1k2
á1ca
ác1al
ácá2ná
á1cá
á2c1e
á1c3ho
ác2h
ácin2ti
á1ci
áci2ós2z
áci1ó
á2cs1aj
ác2s
á1c1sa
á2csas
á2c3ság
á1c1sá
á2cs1e2l
á1c1se
á2csil
á1c1si
á1c1sü2
ács1ül
ád1alk
á1da
áda2n
ád1an2y
á2d1a1pá
á2d1ál
á1dá
á2d1e2l
á1de
á2d1e2m
áde2ros
áde1ro
á2d1es
á2d1in
á1di
ád1i1ra
ád2o2ge2
á1do
á2d1os2z
á1dö2
á1d2rót
ád1ró
ád1s1za2
áds2z
á2d1ur
á1du
á1dy
á1e2
á1é
áé2he
áé2ke
áé2l
áé2ne
áé2p
áé2re
áé2ri
áé2r2õ.
áé1rõ
áf1elm
á1fe
áf1üz
á1fü
á2g1a2d
á1ga
ág1a1la
á2g1a2r
1á2gaz
á2g1ág
á1gá
á2g1álv
á2g1á2ru
á2g1árv
ágá2sé2
ág1e2d
á1ge
á2g1e2g
á2g1e2l
á2g1e2s
á2g1é2g
á1gé
á2g1é2l
ág1é2ne
á2g1ép
á2g1érd
á2g1ér1te
á2g1ér1té
ágg2
ág1gr
á2g1id
á1gi
á2g1if
á2g1i1ga
á2gi2gén
ági1gé
á2g1ill
á2g1ing
á2g1i2p
á2g1i1ro
ág1ír
á1gí
á2g1o1la
á1go
á2g1old
á2g1olv
ágos3s
ág1óc
á1gó
á2g1ö2
ágs2z2
ágs2
á2g1u2r
á1gu
á2g1u2t
á2g1ü2
á2g1û2
á2gyac
ág2y
á1gya
á2gyál
á1gyá
á2gy1e2
2á1ha
2á1há
2á1he
áh1ors
á1ho
á1i
ái2do
ái2g
ái2j
2áil
ái2má
ái2rá
ái2s
á1í2
á2jí
áj2kõ
áj2lá
á2j1or
á1jo
á2jõ
áj2teg
áj1te
áj2tel
áj2ti
á2jul
á1ju
á2jü
ák1abr2
á1ka
á2k1al
á2k1as
á2k1ál
á1ká
á2k1e2l
á1ke
ák1em
á2k1é2l
á1ké
ák1é2ve
ák1in
á1ki
